New York, session 2025-2026, A11350.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 425 of the real property tax law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (a-3) to read as follows: 3 (a-3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, where an 4 initial application for the "enhanced" STAR exemption authorized by 5 subdivision four of this section has not been filed on or before the 6 taxable status date, and the applicant is otherwise entitled to the 7 exemption, such applicant shall be granted a one-time extension of the 8 filing deadline. The applicant shall submit a written request to the 9 commissioner asking them to extend the filing deadline and grant the 10 exemption. The commissioner shall grant the exemption if the commission- 11 er is satisfied that (i) the applicant has not been granted such exten- 12 sion before and (ii) the applicant is otherwise entitled to the 13 exemption. The commissioner shall mail notice of their determination to 14 such owner and the assessor. If the determination states that the 15 commissioner has granted the exemption, the assessor shall thereupon be 16 authorized and directed to correct the assessment roll accordingly, or, 17 if another person has custody or control of the assessment roll, to 18 direct that person to make the appropriate corrections. If the 19 correction is not made before school taxes are levied, the failure to 20 take the exemption into account in the computation of the tax shall be 21 deemed a "clerical error" for purposes of title three of article five of 22 this chapter, and shall be corrected accordingly. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08587-01-5